Utah statutes.
41-1a-209.   Application for registration -- Contents.

(1)  An owner of a vehicle subject to registration under this part shall apply to the division for registration on forms furnished by the division.

(2)  The application for registration shall include:

(a)  the signature of an owner of the vehicle to be registered;

(b)  the name, bona fide residence and mailing address of the owner, or business address of the owner if the owner is a firm, association, or corporation;

(c)  a description of the vehicle including the make, model, type of body, the model year as specified by the manufacturer, the number of cylinders, and the identification number of the vehicle; and

(d)  other information required by the division to enable it to determine whether the owner is lawfully entitled to register the vehicle.

